Wyoming, session 2025, SF0067.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlv)(B) and (C)(II) is
amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

SF0067

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0170
(xlv) A portion of property used as a primary
residence by long-term homeowners as provided in this
paragraph. The following shall apply to this exemption:

(B) Not more than one (1) exemption under
this paragraph shall apply to the same property in any year
and no owner shall claim more than one (1) exemption under
this paragraph in any year including property that houses
more than one (1) family. To claim an exemption under this
paragraph the owner of the residential real property shall
submit a claim to the county assessor not later than the
fourth Monday in May each year on forms provided by the
department of revenue demonstrating that the person is the
owner of the property, that the person or the person's
spouse is sixty-five (65) years of age or older and has
paid residential property tax in Wyoming for twenty-five
(25) years or more on any residential property and that the
property is the person's primary residence. A surviving
spouse of a person who qualified under this paragraph and
who would not otherwise qualify under this paragraph shall
continue to qualify for the exemption under this paragraph.
False claims are punishable as provided by W.S. 6-5-303;

SF0067

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0170
(C) As used in this paragraph:

(II) "Primary residence" means
residential real property where the person claiming the
exemption actually resides for not less than eight (8) six
(6) months of the year;

Section 2. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 106,
Section 2 is repealed.

Section 3. The exemption provided by W.S.
39-11-105(a)(xlv) as amended in section 1 of this act shall
first apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0067